Illinois, session 104th, HB2944.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-65 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-65 new)7    Sec. 5-65. Reimbursement for extended hospital stays for 8dementia patient. For an extended hospital stay beyond medical 9necessity due to multiple failed attempts to place an 10emergency room patient who presented for dementia or other 11long-term care needs into a nursing or other long-term care 12facility, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 13shall reimburse the hospital at a rate calculated to cover the 14entire hospital stay if (i) the hospital presents 15documentation, as prescribed by the Department, of multiple 16unsuccessful attempts to place the patient in a nursing or 17other long-term care facility and (ii) if each nursing or 18long-term care facility the hospital solicited for placement 19gave a substantially similar reason for denying the patient 20admission.